Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Fish Traps and Other Illegal Fishing Devices.

Collateral references. —

Forfeiture of property for unlawful use, before trial of individual offender.
3 ALR2d 738.

Entrapment with respect to violation of fish and game laws.
75 ALR2d 709.

Sec. 16.10.060.
Prohibition against use of fish traps. [Repealed, § 27 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 16.10.070.
Operation of fish traps.

Fish traps, including but not limited to floating, pile-driven, or hand-driven fish traps, may not be operated in the state on or over state land, tideland, submerged land, or water.
This section does not prevent the operation of small hand-driven fish traps of the type ordinarily used on rivers of the state that are otherwise legally operated in or above the mouth of a stream or river.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.10.080.
Federal compact exempted.

AS

16.10.070

may not be construed to violate sec. 4, P.L. 85-508 (72 Stat. 339) (Alaska Statehood Act), which constitutes a compact between the United States and Alaska, under which the state disclaims all right and title to land or other property (including fishing rights), the right or title to which may be held by Indians, Eskimos, or Aleuts, hereafter referred to as Natives, or which is held by the United States in trust for these Natives.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.10.090.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.10.070.

A person who violates AS

16.10.070

is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $5,000 or by both.

History.

(§ 5 ch 95 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.10.100.
Erection of fish traps prohibited on land or water owned by state.

Fish traps, including but not limited to floating, pile-driven, or hand-driven fish traps, may not be erected, moored, or maintained on or over land, tideland, submerged land, or water owned or otherwise acquired by the state.
This section does not prevent the maintenance, use, or operation of small, hand-driven fish traps of the type ordinarily used on rivers of the state which are otherwise legally maintained and operated in or above the mouth of a stream or river.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 95 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.10.110.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.10.100.

A person who violates AS

16.10.100

is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 3 ch 17 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 1959)

Sec. 16.10.120.
Use of drum or reel in operation of purse seine.

A person may not use, employ, or operate a drum or reel around which a purse seine is coiled, rolled, or looped for purposes of taking or removing fish from a body of water located on or over land or tideland owned by the state or over which the state has jurisdiction.
This section does not prevent the use of power blocks or the use of a reel mounted on a seine skiff to haul in or let out the separate purse seine lead which is temporarily connected to the purse seine proper, as these terms are generally employed or used in the fishing industry.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1962)

Sec. 16.10.125.
Use of termination device on shellfish and bottom fish pot required.

The Board of Fisheries shall, by regulation, prescribe a termination device or devices for all shellfish and bottom fish pots.
In this section “termination device” means a biodegradable seam or panel or other device that renders the pot incapable of holding shellfish or bottom fish for more than six months when it is continuously immersed in sea water.

History.

(§ 3 ch 103 SLA 1977)

Sec. 16.10.130.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.10.120 or 16.10.125.

A person who violates AS

16.10.120

or

16.10.125

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 103 SLA 1977)

Secs. 16.10.140 — 16.10.160.
Taking of herring spawn. [Repealed, § 2 ch 91 SLA 1970.]